Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-265
Public grounds and highways; control.

The mayor and city council of a city of the primary class shall have supervision and control of all public ways and public grounds within the city and shall require the same to be kept open, in repair, and free from nuisances.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 96, p. 105;

R.S.1913, § 4475;

C.S.1922, § 3860;

C.S.1929, § 15-263;

R.S.1943, § 15-265;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 75.

Performance of duty under this section is part of business of city of Lincoln within contemplation of compensation law. Sentor v. City of Lincoln, 124 Neb. 403, 246 N.W. 924 (1933).

Allowing and regulating entrances to basements through sidewalks is within discretion of city authorities. State ex rel. McNerney v. Armstrong, 97 Neb. 343, 149 N.W. 786 (1914).

City has general control of its streets and of the grades thereof. Omaha, L. & B. Ry. Co. v. City of Lincoln, 97 Neb. 122, 149 N.W. 319 (1914).

City must keep streets and sidewalks free of obstructions for entire width, and is not estopped by past failure to enforce. Chapman v. City of Lincoln, 84 Neb. 534, 121 N.W. 596 (1909).

Owners need not repair until notified. City of Lincoln v. Janesch, 63 Neb. 707, 89 N.W. 280 (1902).